West Virginia, session 2025, SB437.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 37. West Virginia Coal Marketing Program. §22-37-1. Purpose of the Program. (a) There is created the West Virginia Coal Marketing Program to be administered by the Governor. The purpose of the program is to protect and expand West Virginia's coal markets and coal facilities and to address impacts cities, towns, and counties have experienced or will experience due to changes in the coal market.(b) The Governor shall expend funds appropriated to the Governor for operating the program only on the following:(1) Projects with a public benefit associated with expanding and protecting West Virginia's coal markets and coal facilities; and(2) Projects with a public benefit that address impacts cities, towns, and counties have experienced or will experience due to changes in the coal market.(c) No funds shall be provided for projects under this article without the written opinion of the Attorney General certifying the legality of the transaction and all documents connected therewith.(d) On or before October 1 of each year, the Governor shall report to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance on the projects funded by the West Virginia Coal Marketing Program. The report shall include the amount, the recipient, and a description of each project funded.(e) There is created the West Virginia Coal Marketing Program account. All funds in the account are continuously appropriated to the Governor to be expended for the purposes of this article and as otherwise specified by law. The Governor may expend funds in this account as provided in subsection (b) of this section. Interest earned on funds in the account shall be deposited in the account.(f) The Governor may accept, and shall deposit in the account, any gifts, contributions, donations, grants, or federal funds specifically designated for the benefit of the West Virginia Coal Marketing Program or any project funded under the program. §22-37-2. Funding. There is appropriated $1 million from the general fund to the West Virginia Coal Marketing Program account created by §22-37-1(e). The Governor shall only expend this appropriation for the West Virginia Coal Marketing Program as provided for in §22-37-1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. §22-37-3. Rules. The Governor shall promulgate any rules necessary to implement the West Virginia Coal Marketing Program. §22-37-4. Effective date. This article shall become effective 90 days after passage.